Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-364.13
Support order; requirements.

(1) Any order for support entered by the court shall specifically provide that any person ordered to pay a judgment shall be required to furnish to the clerk of the district court his or her address, telephone number, and social security number, the name of his or her employer, whether or not such person has access to employer-related health insurance coverage and, if so, the health insurance policy information, and any other information the court deems relevant until such judgment is paid in full. The person shall also be required to advise the clerk of any changes in such information between the time of entry of the decree and the payment of the judgment in full. If both parents are parties to the action, such order shall provide that each be required to furnish to the clerk of the district court all of the information required by this subsection. Failure to comply with this section shall be punishable by contempt.

(2) All support orders entered by the court shall include the year of birth of any child for whom the order requires the provision of support.

(3) Until the Title IV-D Division of the Department of Health and Human Services has operative the statewide automated data processing and retrieval system necessary for centralized collection and disbursement of support order payments:

(a) If any case contains an order or judgment for child, medical, or spousal support, the order shall include the following statements:

In the event that the (plaintiff or defendant) fails to pay any child, medical, or spousal support payment, as such failure is certified each month by the district court clerk in cases in which court-ordered support is delinquent in an amount equal to the support due and payable for a one-month period of time, he or she shall be subject to income withholding and may be required to appear in court on a date to be determined by the court and show cause why such payment was not made. In the event that the (plaintiff or defendant) fails to pay and appear as ordered, a warrant shall be issued for his or her arrest.

(b) If the court orders income withholding regardless of whether or not payments are in arrears pursuant to section 43-1718.01 or 43-1718.02, the statement in this subsection may be altered to read as follows:

In the event that the (plaintiff or defendant) fails to pay any child, medical, or spousal support payment, as such failure is certified each month by the district court clerk in cases in which court-ordered support is delinquent in an amount equal to the support due and payable for a one-month period of time, he or she may be required to appear in court on a date to be determined by the court and show cause why such payment was not made. In the event that the (plaintiff or defendant) fails to pay and appear as ordered, a warrant shall be issued for his or her arrest.

(4) When the Title IV-D Division of the Department of Health and Human Services has operative the statewide automated data processing and retrieval system necessary for centralized collection and disbursement of support order payments:

(a) If any case contains an order or judgment for child, medical, or spousal support, the order shall include the following statements:

In the event that the (plaintiff or defendant) fails to pay any child, medical, or spousal support payment, as such failure is certified each month by the State Disbursement Unit in cases in which court-ordered support is delinquent in an amount equal to the support due and payable for a one-month period of time, he or she shall be subject to income withholding and may be required to appear in court on a date to be determined by the court and show cause why such payment was not made. In the event that the (plaintiff or defendant) fails to pay and appear as ordered, a warrant shall be issued for his or her arrest.

(b) If the court orders income withholding regardless of whether or not payments are in arrears pursuant to section 43-1718.01 or 43-1718.02, the statement in this subsection may be altered to read as follows:

In the event that the (plaintiff or defendant) fails to pay any child, medical, or spousal support payment, as such failure is certified each month by the State Disbursement Unit in cases in which court-ordered support is delinquent in an amount equal to the support due and payable for a one-month period of time, he or she may be required to appear in court on a date to be determined by the court and show cause why such payment was not made. In the event that the (plaintiff or defendant) fails to pay and appear as ordered, a warrant shall be issued for his or her arrest.

Laws 1983, LB 371, § 9;

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 30;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 17;

Laws 1993, LB 523, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 45;

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 13;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 27;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 36;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 59;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 34.